Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-610
Authorized emergency vehicle, defined.

Authorized
emergency vehicle shall mean such fire department vehicles, police vehicles,
rescue vehicles, and ambulances as are publicly owned, such other publicly
or privately owned vehicles as are designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles,
and such publicly owned military vehicles of the National Guard as are designated
by the Adjutant General pursuant to section 55-133.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 106;

Laws 2008, LB196, § 2.